Massachusetts, session 194th, H2040.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “time, not to exceed
one year”, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 1 year.
SECTION 2. Said section 3 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the words “one year.”, in line 104, the following sentence:- When a
court orders the defendant to refrain from abusing or contacting the plaintiff pursuant to clause
(a) or (b), the order shall be for a period of 1 year.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “effect”, in line 18, the following words:- for 1 year.
of 3

SECTION 4. Said section 4 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for notice to the defendant shall
notify the victim and, where appropriate, the victim’s family members when notice of a
temporary restraining order or other abuse prevention order: (i) has been successfully served; (ii)
has not been successfully served, and the effect of non-service on the restraining order’s validity;
or (iii) has expired or otherwise become ineffective.
SECTION 5. The second paragraph of section 7 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- A court shall
authorize both options of: service in hand to the defendant or service at the defendant’s last and
usual address.
SECTION 6. Said section 7 of said chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
When service to a defendant is required pursuant to this section, the appropriate law
enforcement agency shall provide the defendant’s information and the notice materials to the
department of criminal justice information services, which shall forthwith enter the information
and notice in the public safety information system established in section 167A of chapter 6. Any
law enforcement officer, upon learning through the public safety information system of an
unserved order issued pursuant to this chapter, shall forthwith effect service upon a defendant.
SECTION 7. Section 3 of chapter 258B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after clause (w) the following clause:-
of 3

(x) for victims, family members and witnesses, the right to be notified by the local law
enforcement agency when notice of a temporary restraining order or other abuse prevention
order: (1) has been successfully served; (2) has not been successfully served, and the effect of
non-service on the restraining order’s validity; or (3) has expired or otherwise become
ineffective.
SECTION 8. The victim and witness assistance board, established in section 4 of chapter
258B of the General Laws, shall conduct a survey of the victim and witness assistance services
in local law enforcement agencies, courthouses and district attorney’s offices. The board shall
review the program plans submitted by the district attorneys pursuant to section 6 of said chapter
258B, assess the effectiveness of the services provided to victims and witnesses and identify
areas in need of improvement. Not later than 1 year following the passage of this act, the board
shall submit a report on
its survey to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee
on the judiciary and the joint committee on public safety and homeland security.
SECTION 9. This act shall be known as “Kianna’s Law.”
of 3